Maine, session 132, LD486.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §108, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2007, c. 173, §24, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) The person knows that the person or a 3rd person can, with complete safety:
(a) Retreat from the encounter, except that the person or the 3rd person is not
required to retreat if the person or the 3rd person is in the person's dwelling
place and was not the initial aggressor;
(b) Surrender property to a person asserting a colorable claim of right thereto;
or.
(c) Comply with a demand that the person abstain from performing an act that
the person is not obliged to perform.